Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 12. Kinds of Insurance, Limits of Risk, and Reinsurance.

Administrative Code. —

For reinsurance, see 3 AAC 21, art. 6.

Sec. 21.12.010.
Limit of risk.

An insurer may not retain a risk on any one subject of insurance, whether located or to be performed in this state or elsewhere, in an amount exceeding 10 percent of its surplus to policyholders.

In this section a “subject of insurance” as to insurance against fire and hazards other than windstorm, earthquake, and other catastrophe hazards, includes all properties insured by the same insurer that are customarily considered by underwriters to be subject to loss or damage from the same fire or the same occurrence of the hazard insured against.

Reinsurance ceded as authorized by AS

21.12.020

shall be deducted in determining risk retained. As to surety risks, deduction shall also be made of the amount assumed by an established incorporated cosurety and the value of a security deposited, pledged or held subject to the surety’s consent and for the surety’s protection.

As to alien insurers, this section relates only to risks and surplus to policyholders of the insurer’s United States branch.

In this section “surplus to policyholders” in addition to the insurer’s capital and surplus includes any voluntary reserves that are not required under law, and are determined from the last sworn statement of the insurer on file with the director, or by the last report of examination of the insurer, whichever is more recent at time of assumption of risk.

This section does not apply to life or health insurance, annuities, title insurance, insurance of wet marine and transportation risks, workers’ compensation insurance, employer’s liability coverages, sprinklered risks, or to a policy or type of coverage in which the maximum possible loss to the insurer is not readily ascertainable on issuance of the policy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 1996)